Utah statutes.
26-1-9.   Executive director -- Qualifications.

(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (2), the executive director shall be a physician who is a graduate of a regularly chartered and legally constituted medical school, licensed to practice medicine and surgery in all branches in the state, who has successfully completed:

(a)  a master's degree of public health from an accredited school of public health or from an accredited program of public health and has at least three years professional full-time experience in a senior level administrative capacity; or

(b)  at least one year's graduate work in an accredited school of public health and has at least five years professional full-time experience, of which at least three years have been in public health in a senior level administrative capacity.

(2)  If the executive director is not a physician under Subsection (1), the executive director shall:

(a) (i)  have successfully completed at least a master's degree of public health or public administration from an accredited school of public health or from an accredited program of public health or public administration; and

(ii)  have at least five years of professional full-time experience, of which at least two years have been in public health in a senior level administrative capacity; or

(b)  have at least seven years of professional full-time experience in public health programs, of which at least five years have been in a senior level administrative capacity.

(3)  An executive director shall be thoroughly informed and experienced in all aspects of public health work.

(4)  If the executive director is not a physician, the deputy director of the department shall be a physician who has successfully completed at least one year's graduate work in an accredited school of public health or an accredited program of public health.

